data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_PT_90.aff
SFX K   r               nhas            por             +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX K   r               nhamos          por             +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX K   r               nhamo-nos       por             +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX K   r               nhais           por             +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX K   r               nham            por             +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX K   or              usesse          por             +P=1_3,N=s,T=pic
SFX K   or              usesses         por             +P=2,N=s,T=pic
SFX K   or              uséssemos       por             +P=1,N=p,T=pic
SFX K   or              uséssemo-nos    por             +P=1,N=p,T=pic
SFX K   or              usésseis        por             +P=2,N=p,T=pic
SFX K   or              usessem         por             +P=3,N=p,T=pic
SFX K   or              user            por             +P=1,N=s,T=fc
SFX K   or              useres          por             +P=2,N=s,T=fc
SFX K   or              user            por             +P=3,N=s,T=fc
SFX K   or              usermos         por             +P=1,N=p,T=fc
SFX K   or              usermo-nos      por             +P=1,N=p,T=fc
SFX K   or              userdes         por             +P=2,N=p,T=fc
SFX K   or              userem          por             +P=3,N=p,T=fc
SFX K   0               ia              por             +P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX K   0               ias             por             +P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX K   0               íamos           por             +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX K   0               íamo-nos        por             +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX K   0               íeis            por             +P=2,N=p,T=c
SFX K   0               iam             por             +P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX K   or              õe              por             +P=2,N=s,T=i
SFX K   r               nha             por             +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX K   r               nhamos          por             +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX K   r               nhamo-nos       por             +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX K   r               nde             por             +P=2,N=p,T=i
SFX K   r               nham            por             +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX K   r               ndo             por             +T=g
SFX K   r               sto             por             +G=m,N=s,T=ppa
SFX K   r               sta             por             +G=f,N=s,T=ppa
SFX K   r               stos            por             +G=m,N=p,T=ppa
SFX K   r               stas            por             +G=f,N=p,T=ppa
SFX K   0               es              por             +P=2,N=s,T=ip
SFX K   0               mos             por             +P=1,N=p,T=ip
SFX K   0               des             por             +P=2,N=p,T=ip
SFX K   0               em              por             +P=3,N=p,T=ip
SFX K   zer             ço              fazer           +P=1,N=s,T=p
SFX K   r               s               fazer           +P=2,N=s,T=p
SFX K   zer             z               fazer           +P=3,N=s,T=p
SFX K   r               mos             fazer           +P=1,N=p,T=p
SFX K   r               is              fazer           +P=2,N=p,T=p
SFX K   r               m               fazer           +P=3,N=p,T=p
SFX K   er              ia              fazer           +P=1_3,N=s,T=pi
SFX K   er              ias             fazer           +P=2,N=s,T=pi
SFX K   er              íamos           fazer           +P=1,N=p,T=pi
SFX K   er              íamo-nos        fazer           +P=1,N=p,T=pi
SFX K   er              íeis            fazer           +P=2,N=p,T=pi
SFX K   er              iam             fazer           +P=3,N=p,T=pi
SFX K   azer            iz              fazer           +P=1,N=s,T=pp
SFX K   azer            izeste          fazer           +P=2,N=s,T=pp
SFX K   azer            ez              fazer           +P=3,N=s,T=pp
SFX K   azer            izemos          fazer           +P=1,N=p,T=pp
SFX K   azer            izemo-nos       fazer           +P=1,N=p,T=pp
SFX K   azer            izestes         fazer           +P=2,N=p,T=pp
SFX K   azer            izeram          fazer           +P=3,N=p,T=pp
SFX K   azer            izera           fazer           +P=1_3,N=s,T=pmp
SFX K   azer            izeras          fazer           +P=2,N=s,T=pmp
SFX K   azer            izéramos        fazer           +P=1,N=p,T=pmp
SFX K   azer            izéramo-nos     fazer           +P=1,N=p,T=pmp
SFX K   azer            izéreis         fazer           +P=2,N=p,T=pmp
SFX K   azer            izeram          fazer           +P=3,N=p,T=pmp
SFX K   zer             rei             fazer           +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX K   zer             rás             fazer           +P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX K   zer             rá              fazer           +P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX K   zer             remos           fazer           +P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX K   zer             remo-nos        fazer           +P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX K   zer             reis            fazer           +P=2,N=p,T=f
SFX K   zer             rão             fazer           +P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX K   zer             ça              fazer           +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX K   zer             ças             fazer           +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX K   zer             çamos           fazer           +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX K   zer             çamo-nos        fazer           +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX K   zer             çais            fazer           +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX K   zer             çam             fazer           +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX K   azer            izesse          fazer           +P=1_3,N=s,T=pic
SFX K   azer            izesses         fazer           +P=2,N=s,T=pic
SFX K   azer            izéssemos       fazer           +P=1,N=p,T=pic
SFX K   azer            izéssemo-nos    fazer           +P=1,N=p,T=pic
SFX K   azer            izésseis        fazer           +P=2,N=p,T=pic
SFX K   azer            izessem         fazer           +P=3,N=p,T=pic
SFX K   azer            izer            fazer           +P=1,N=s,T=fc
SFX K   azer            izeres          fazer           +P=2,N=s,T=fc
SFX K   azer            izer            fazer           +P=3,N=s,T=fc
SFX K   azer            izermos         fazer           +P=1,N=p,T=fc
SFX K   azer            izermo-nos      fazer           +P=1,N=p,T=fc
SFX K   azer            izerdes         fazer           +P=2,N=p,T=fc
SFX K   azer            izerem          fazer           +P=3,N=p,T=fc
SFX K   zer             ria             fazer           +P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX K   zer             rias            fazer           +P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX K   zer             ríamos          fazer           +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX K   zer             ríamo-nos       fazer           +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX K   zer             ríeis           fazer           +P=2,N=p,T=c
SFX K   zer             riam            fazer           +P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX K   zer             z               fazer           +P=2,N=s,T=i
SFX K   zer             ça              fazer           +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX K   zer             çamos           fazer           +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX K   zer             çamo-nos        fazer           +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX K   r               i               fazer           +P=2,N=p,T=i
SFX K   zer             çam             fazer           +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX K   r               ndo             fazer           +T=g
SFX K   azer            eito            fazer           +G=m,N=s,T=ppa
SFX K   azer            eita            fazer           +G=f,N=s,T=ppa
SFX K   azer            eitos           fazer           +G=m,N=p,T=ppa
SFX K   azer            eitas           fazer           +G=f,N=p,T=ppa
SFX K   0               es              fazer           +P=2,N=s,T=ip
SFX K   0               mos             fazer           +P=1,N=p,T=ip
SFX K   0               des             fazer           +P=2,N=p,T=ip
SFX K   0               em              fazer           +P=3,N=p,T=ip
SFX K   zer             go              dizer           +P=1,N=s,T=p
SFX K   r               s               dizer           +P=2,N=s,T=p
SFX K   zer             z               dizer           +P=3,N=s,T=p
