data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_PT_90.dic
abstrair/KPL
afazer/KPL
afluir/KL
aluir/KPLM
antedizer/KPL
antepor/KPL
anuir/KL
apor/KPL
atrair/KPLM
bendizer/KPL
cair/KLM
carnifazer/KL
compor/KPLR
concluir/KPL
condizer/KLn
confluir/KL
constituir/KPLcDvR
contradizer/KPL
contrafazer/KPL
contrair/KPLvSBn
contrapor/KPL
contrapropor/KPL
contribuir/KLcDn
decair/KLM
decompor/KPL
defluir/KL
depor/KPL
descair/KLM
descompor/KPL
desdizer/KL
desfruir/KPL
destituir/KPLc
diluir/KPLcM
diminuir/KPLcD
dispor/KPL
distrair/KPLMD
distribuir/KPLcDv
efluir/KL
esvair/KPLM
evoluir/KL
excluir/KPL
expor/KPLRc
extorquir/KPL
fluir/KL
fruir/KLc
imbuir/KPLc
imiscuir/KLc
impor/KL
incluir/KPL
indispor/KPL
influir/KPLD
instituir/KPLcDR
interdizer/KPL
interpor/KPL
intuir/KPLc
justapor/KPL
liquefazer/KPL
maldizer/KLn
malfazer/KLn
opor/KPL
perfazer/KPL
pospor/KPL
possuir/KPLDn
predispor/KPL
predizer/KPL
prepor/KPL
pressupor/KPL
promiscuir/KL
propor/KPL
prostituir/KPLcDv
protrair/KPL
putrefazer/KPL
rarefazer/KPL
recair/KLM
redistribuir/KPLc
refluir/KL
repor/KPL
ressair/KL
ressequir/KPL
restituir/KPLcDv
retorquir/KPLv
retrair/KPLM
retribuir/KPLcD
ruir/KL
sair/KLn
satisfazer/KPLvI
sobrepor/KL
sobressair/KL
subpor/KPL
substituir/KPLcnv
subtrair/KPL
supor/KPL
trair/KPLcMD
detrair/KPL
transpor/KPL
trespor/KPL
usufruir/KPLcD
atribuir/DKLPclpv
dizer/KLPlpv
dirimir/KPL
exaurir/KPL
autorreproduzir/KPL
